Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Pharmaceutical Utilization Review

205.5631.
Definitions for KRS 205.5631 to 205.5639.

As used in KRS 205.5631 to 205.5639, “commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department for Medicaid Services.

As used in KRS 205.5632, “new drug” means a drug that is approved for marketing by the Federal Food and Drug Administration under a product licensing application, new drug application, or a supplement to a new drug application, and that is a new chemical or molecular entity, but shall not mean the following:

Drugs, classes of drugs, or medical uses identified in 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396r-8(d)(2), as amended;

Drugs that are considered to be less than effective by the Federal Food and Drug Administration or drugs that are considered to be identical, related, or similar to the less than effective drugs; and

Drugs that are excluded from coverage by the Kentucky Medicaid program due to lack of compliance by the drug manufacturer with federal drug rebate requirements.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 561, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 7, § 2, effective February 21, 2002.

205.5632.
Prior authorization requirements — Administrative regulations.

Upon initial coverage by the Kentucky Medicaid program, a new drug shall be exempt from prior authorization unless:

There has been a review of the drug and recommendation regarding prior authorization by the Pharmacy and Therapeutics Advisory Committee as provided under KRS 205.564 and a final determination regarding prior authorization by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services; or

The drug is in a specific class of drugs for which the Pharmacy and Therapeutics Advisory Committee has recommended, and the secretary of health and family services has determined, that all new drugs shall require prior authorization upon initial availability, in which case the drug shall require prior authorization and shall be scheduled for review by the Pharmacy and Therapeutics Advisory Committee within seventy-five (75) days.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A that describes the process by which drugs under this section shall be determined to require prior authorization.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 561, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 521, § 26, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 7, § 3, effective February 21, 2002; 2005, ch. 99, § 236, effective June 20, 2005.

205.5634.
Coordination of use of utilization data — Identification of appropriate use of pharmaceuticals — Determination of need for educational intervention.

The Drug Management Review Advisory Board shall coordinate the use of utilization data to identify appropriate use of pharmaceuticals and determine any need for educational interventions. Prospective drug utilization review and retrospective drug utilization review measures shall be utilized to monitor the success of the interventions. Interventions shall be evaluated for a period of not less than six (6) months.

Implementation and performance of the duties of this section and KRS 205.5631, 205.5632, and 205.5636 and any drug review shall be performed by the staff of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, or its contractors.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 561, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 7, § 4, effective February 21, 2002; 2005, ch. 99, § 237, effective June 20, 2005.

205.5636.
Drug Management Review Advisory Board — Membership — Officers — Meetings.

A Drug Management Review Advisory Board is hereby established and attached to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services for administrative purposes. The board shall consist of sixteen (16) members to be appointed by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and shall be constituted as follows:

Five (5) members shall be physicians, one (1) each from the fields of family medicine, internal medicine, pediatrics, and geriatrics. The fifth physician appointed shall be from any other recognized field of medicine. Two (2) of the above indicated physicians shall be representatives of the two (2) current medical schools in the Commonwealth, the University of Kentucky and the University of Louisville Schools of Medicine;

Five (5) members shall be pharmacists, at least one (1) of whom shall be designated as the representative of the University of Kentucky College of Pharmacy;

Two (2) members shall be advanced practice registered nurses;

One (1) member shall be an optometrist and one (1) member shall be a physician’s assistant;

One (1) member shall be a representative of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services designated to serve on an ex officio basis; and

One (1) nonvoting member shall be a member of the pharmaceutical manufacturing industry.

The physician members of the board shall be appointed from a list of three (3) qualified physicians for each vacancy submitted by the Kentucky Medical Association.
(2) (a)

The physician members of the board shall be appointed from a list of three (3) qualified physicians for each vacancy submitted by the Kentucky Medical Association.

The pharmacist members of the board shall be appointed from a list of three (3) qualified pharmacists for each vacancy submitted by the Kentucky Pharmacy Association.

The advanced practice registered nurse members of the board shall be appointed from a list of three (3) for each vacancy, submitted by the Kentucky Nurses Association.

The optometrist shall be appointed from a list of three (3) qualified optometrists submitted by the Kentucky Optometric Association.

The physician’s assistant shall be appointed from a list of three (3) qualified physicians assistants submitted by the Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure.

The secretary may appoint one (1) nonvoting industry representative to be selected from a list of three (3) members nominated from the Pharmaceutical Research and Manufacturers of America. The secretary may request additional names for appointments and current members may be considered for reappointment. All members of the board shall be licensed and actively practicing in their respective professions in the Commonwealth and shall have knowledge or expertise in at least one (1) of the following areas:

The clinically appropriate prescribing, utilization, and evaluation of pharmaceuticals;

The clinically appropriate dispensing and monitoring of pharmaceuticals;

Drug utilization review, pharmacoeconomic and pharmacoepidemiological evaluation and intervention, pharmacotherapeutic intervention methods in disease management using treatment algorithms, critical paths, and other measures that have been well defined and validated; and

Medical quality assurance.

Three (3) of the initially appointed physician members, three (3) of the initially appointed pharmacist members, and one (1) of the initially appointed advanced practice registered nurses shall be appointed for a term of one (1) year. The remaining initial members shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years. Subsequent appointments shall be for a term of two (2) years. Members shall serve for no more than three (3) consecutive terms. The board shall designate a chair and vice chair. A member shall serve no more than two (2) consecutive terms as chair.

The first meeting of the board shall take place within thirty (30) days of the appointment of all the members of the board.

The board shall meet at least quarterly, or upon the call of the chair or the commissioner. A majority of the voting members of the board shall constitute a quorum. All meetings shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of the Open Meetings Act, KRS 61.805 to 61.850, and all balloting shall take place by roll call vote.

Actions of the board shall require a majority vote of the members present or participating through distance communication technology. No member may vote on a matter where a conflict of interest may exist. The chair may vote on any matter before the board unless a conflict of interest exists.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 561, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 238, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 85, § 35, effective July 15, 2010.

205.5638.
Duties and responsibilities of board.

The Drug Management Review Advisory Board shall have at least the following duties and responsibilities:

Review and make recommendations to the commissioner or designee on predetermined prospective drug use review standards submitted to the board by the Department for Medicaid Services or its contractor;

Evaluate the use of the predetermined prospective drug use review standards and make recommendations to the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee concerning modification or elimination of existing standards and the need for additional standards;

Make recommendations to the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee concerning guidelines governing written predetermined standards that pharmacies must use in conducting prospective drug use review if they do not use approved software;

Oversee the retrospective drug use review contract and incorporate the results into predetermined retrospective drug use review standards;

Review and make recommendations to the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee on predetermined retrospective drug use standards submitted to the board by the Department for Medicaid Services;

Make recommendations to the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee concerning the modification or elimination of existing predetermined retrospective drug use review standards and the need for additional standards;

Identify and develop educational topics on common drug therapy problems if needed to improve prescribing or dispensing practices of practitioners;

Make recommendations to the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee concerning which mix of interventions would most effectively lead to an improvement in the quality of drug therapy;

Conduct periodic reevaluations to determine the effectiveness of educational effort and, if necessary, modify the interventions;

Recommend standards for the identification of suspected fraud and abuse;

Prepare and submit to the commissioner an annual drug use review report that contains the following information:

A description of the nature and scope of the retrospective drug utilization program including the identity of the contractor, the frequency of screening of claims data and the criteria and standards used, along with new or revised copies of the clinical criteria, and in subsequent years, a list of revised criteria and deleted criteria;

A summary of nonpatient and provider specific educational activities including information on the use of each type of patient and provider specific intervention that indicates the guidelines for use and frequency of use by type of intervention and the effectiveness of each type of intervention on changes in prescribing or dispensing practices;

An evaluation of the adequacy of prospective drug use review database software; and

Details on policy guidelines adopted by the board pertaining to written criteria that pharmacies may use if they do not use a computer prospective drug utilization review database; and

In advising the department, the board may consider the effectiveness of all interventions used to manage a particular disease over time, the stage and intensity of the disease, and the economic, clinical, and patient-prospective outcomes, including quality of life.

The board shall function in accordance with the Kentucky Open Meetings Law and the Kentucky Open Records Act. The board may designate subcommittees to address specific issues and to report findings to the board. In conducting its business, the board shall utilize distance communication technologies whenever possible.

Clerical and administrative support shall be provided the board through the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or by contract.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 561, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 7, § 5, effective February 21, 2002; 2005, ch. 99, § 239, effective June 20, 2005.

205.5639.
Effect of board recommendations — Written exceptions — Final decision — Appeal.

Any recommendation by the board is advisory to the commissioner.

Any interested party may request an opportunity to make a presentation or argument to the board on any item under consideration by the board. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall, by administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, establish requirements for presentations before the board.

Any interested party who is aggrieved by a recommendation of the board to the commissioner or his designee may submit written exceptions consisting of only new information that was not available to be presented at the time of the board’s consideration of the matter. These written exceptions shall be submitted within ten (10) days of the recommendation. After the time for filing exceptions has expired, the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee shall consider all exceptions filed in a timely manner prior to acting upon the recommendation of the board. If the deadline for filing written exceptions falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or a state holiday, the exceptions may be filed the following day.

In making a final decision on any recommendation of the board, the commissioner may seek additional and clarifying information from any source. Any additional information submitted to the commissioner shall be made a part of the administrative record supporting the final decision.

An appeal from a decision of the commissioner may be made in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B by a manufacturer of the product. Unless held in abeyance or otherwise addressed by the hearing officer, the decision of the commissioner stands until final disposition of the issue.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 561, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 240, effective June 20, 2005.

205.564.
Pharmacy and Therapeutics Advisory Committee — Membership — Duties — Information posted on Web site — Recommendations — Presentations by interested parties — Appeals — Administrative regulations.

The Pharmacy and Therapeutics Advisory Committee is established and attached to the Department for Medicaid Services for administrative purposes.

The committee shall have fifteen (15) members, as follows:

Thirteen (13) voting members who shall be physicians currently participating in the Medicaid program who may legally prescribe a broad range of scheduled and nonscheduled drugs, as categorized by the U.S. Drug Enforcement Administration, or pharmacists who dispense prescriptions to Medicaid recipients, as follows:

Three (3) licensed, practicing family practice physicians;

Two (2) licensed, practicing physicians who are pediatricians;

One (1) licensed, practicing physician who is an obstetrician/gynecologist or gynecologist;

One (1) licensed, practicing internal medicine physician who is a primary care provider;

One (1) licensed, practicing physician from any medical specialty;

Two (2) licensed, practicing physicians who are psychiatrists, one (1) who is a practicing psychiatrist in a community mental health center and one (1) from either the School of Medicine, University of Louisville, or the College of Medicine, University of Kentucky; and

Three (3) licensed, practicing pharmacists; and

Two (2) nonvoting members, as follows:

The medical director of the department; and

A representative of the department’s pharmacy program, as designated by the commissioner.

One (1) voting committee member shall be appointed, and may be reappointed, by the Governor from a list of three (3) nominees received from the President of the Senate, and one (1) voting committee member shall be appointed, and may be reappointed, by the Governor from a list of three (3) nominees received from the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The remaining eleven (11) voting committee members shall be appointed, and may be reappointed, by the Governor from a list of nominees submitted by the department. Terms of the voting committee members shall be three (3) years with no members serving more than two (2) consecutive terms, except that a member may continue to serve his or her term until a successor is appointed.

The Pharmacy and Therapeutics Advisory Committee shall:

Act in an advisory capacity to the Governor, the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, and the Medicaid commissioner on the development and administration of an outpatient drug formulary;

Perform drug reviews and make recommendations to the commissioner regarding specific drugs or drug classes to be placed on prior authorization or otherwise restricted, as determined through a process established by the cabinet;

Provide for an appeals process to be utilized by a person or entity that disagrees with recommendations of the committee;

Establish bylaws or rules for the conduct of committee meetings; and

Function in accordance with the Kentucky Open Meetings Law and the Kentucky Open Records Law.

Voting members of the committee shall elect a chair and vice chair by majority vote. A quorum shall consist of eight (8) voting members of the committee.

The committee shall meet every other month for a total of at least six (6) times per calendar year or upon the call of the chair, the commissioner, the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, or the Governor. The Department for Medicaid Services shall post the agenda on its Web site no later than fourteen (14) days prior to the date of a regularly scheduled meeting and no later than seventy-two (72) hours prior to the date of a specially called meeting. Options, including any recommendations, by the department for drug review or drug review placement shall be posted on the department’s Web site no later than seven (7) days prior to the date of the next regularly scheduled meeting and as soon as practicable prior to the date of the next specially called meeting.

Members of the committee shall receive no compensation for service, but shall receive necessary and actual travel expenses associated with attending meetings.

Any recommendation of the committee to the commissioner shall be posted to the Web site of the Department for Medicaid Services within seven (7) days of the date of the meeting at which the recommendation was made.

A recommendation of the committee shall be submitted to the commissioner for a final determination. If the commissioner does not accept the recommendation of the committee, the commissioner shall present the basis for the final determination at the next scheduled meeting of the committee. The commissioner shall act on the committee’s recommendation within thirty (30) days of the date that the recommendation was posted on the Web site.

Any interested party may request and may be permitted to make a presentation to the board on any item under consideration by the board. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall, by administrative regulation promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A, establish requirements for any presentation made to the board.

The commissioner’s final determination shall be posted on the Web site of the Department for Medicaid Services.

Any appeal from a decision of the commissioner shall be made in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, except that the time for filing an appeal shall be within thirty (30) days of the date of the posting of the commissioner’s final determination on the Web site of the Department for Medicaid Services.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement the provisions of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 7, § 1, effective February 21, 2002; 2005, ch. 99, § 241, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 33, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2012, ch. 158, § 27, effective July 12, 2012.

205.5641.
Prior authorization not required for medication-assisted therapies in pilot project — No restrictions on participating pharmacies and pharmacists.

A prior authorization shall not be required for noncontrolled medication-assisted therapies for community pharmacies as part of the pilot project KRS 194A.800.

A pharmacy or pharmacist participating in the pilot project established pursuant to KRS 194A.800 shall not be barred, excluded, or have any other mandates, conditions, or restrictions placed on it by any Medicaid managed care organization, or its contracted pharmacy benefit manager, for participation in the pilot program established in KRS 194A.800 or from dispensing medications used in the medication-assisted treatment program.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 133, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.